Utah statutes.
16-10a-830.   Required officers.

(1)  A corporation shall have the officers designated in its bylaws or by the board of directors in a manner not inconsistent with the bylaws.  Any officer shall be a natural person.

(2)  Officers may be appointed by the board of directors or in any other manner as the board of directors or bylaws may provide.  A duly appointed officer may appoint one or more officers or assistant officers if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

(3)  The bylaws or the board of directors shall delegate to one of the officers responsibility for the preparation and maintenance of minutes of the directors' and shareholders' meetings and other records and information required to be kept by the corporation under Section 16-10a-1601 and for authenticating records of the corporation.

(4)  The same individual may simultaneously hold more than one office in a corporation.

